Washington statutes.
RCW 18.220.120

Geologists' account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5294-S.SL) ***

(1) All fees and fines collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid into the geologists' account, created in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The geologists' account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from fines and fees collected under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only to carry out the duties required for the operation and enforcement of this chapter. Only the director of licensing or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2000 c 253 s 13.]